dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- मजा; मजा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मजा__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>लाग्दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खेल्; खेल; 5 -->
    <pardef n="खेल/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेख्; लेख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेख/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेख्; लेख; 12 -->
    <pardef n="लेख/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ता</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िए</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुहोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नुस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थुपार; थुपार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थुपार__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौँ</l>
          <r><s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खिच्; खिच्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="खिच्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उघ्रँ; उघ्रँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उघ्रँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सेक्; सेक्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सेक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आइपुग; आइपुग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आइपुग__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छोड्; छोड; 2 -->
    <pardef n="छोड/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छोड्; छोड; 5 -->
    <pardef n="छोड/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="infml"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ौं</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पार; पार; 5 -->
    <pardef n="पार__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनुपर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदिने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ें</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गर्ने; गर्ने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गर्ने__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>छु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुछ्; मुछ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुछ/्__opt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीदिउँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="opt"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाउ; पाउ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="पाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नुहोस्</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छँ; छँ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="छँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निभाउ; निभाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निभाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाइ; पाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छाम्; छाम्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="छाम्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दाँज; दाँज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दाँज__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मजा"><i>मजा</i><par n="मजा__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="खेल्"><i>खेल</i><par n="खेल/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लेख्"><i>लेख</i><par n="लेख/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="लेख्"><i>लेख</i><par n="लेख/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="थुपार"><i>थुपार</i><par n="थुपार__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="खिच्"><i>खिच्</i><par n="खिच्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="उघ्रँ"><i>उघ्रँ</i><par n="उघ्रँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="सेक्"><i>सेक्</i><par n="सेक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="आइपुग"><i>आइपुग</i><par n="आइपुग__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छोड्"><i>छोड</i><par n="छोड/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="छोड्"><i>छोड</i><par n="छोड/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पार"><i>पार</i><par n="पार__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्ने"><i>गर्ने</i><par n="गर्ने__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="मुछ्"><i>मुछ</i><par n="मुछ/्__opt"/></e>
    <e lm="पाउ"><i>पाउ</i><par n="पाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छँ"><i>छँ</i><par n="छँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="निभाउ"><i>निभाउ</i><par n="निभाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पाइ"><i>पाइ</i><par n="पाइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="छाम्"><i>छाम्</i><par n="छाम्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दाँज"><i>दाँज</i><par n="दाँज__vblex"/></e>
